Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201745-919
Acts prohibited.

(1) No licensee shall:

(a) At any one time hold from any one maker more than two checks;

(b) At any one time hold from any one maker a check or checks in an aggregate face amount of more than five hundred dollars;

(c) Hold or agree to hold a check for more than thirty-four days. A check which is in the process of collection for the reason that it was not negotiable on the day agreed upon shall not be deemed as being held in excess of the thirty-four-day period;

(d) Require the maker to receive payment by a method which causes the maker to pay additional or further fees and charges to the licensee or other person;

(e) Accept a check as repayment, refinancing, or any other consolidation of a check or checks held by the same licensee;

(f) Renew, roll over, defer, or in any way extend a delayed deposit transaction by allowing the maker to pay less than the total amount of the check and any authorized fees or charges. This subdivision shall not prevent a licensee that agreed to hold a check for less than thirty-four days from agreeing to hold the check for an additional period of time no greater than the thirty-four days it would have originally been able to hold the check if (i) the extension is at the request of the maker, (ii) no additional fees are charged for the extension, and (iii) the delayed deposit transaction is completed as required by subdivision (1)(c) of this section. The licensee shall retain written or electronic proof of compliance with this subdivision. If a licensee fails, or is unable, to provide such proof to the department upon request, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that a violation of this subdivision has occurred and the department may pursue any remedies or actions available to it under the Delayed Deposit Services Licensing Act; or

(g) Enter into another delayed deposit transaction with the same maker on the same business day as the completion of a delayed deposit transaction unless prior to entering into the transaction the maker and the licensee verify on a form prescribed by the department that completion of the prior delayed deposit transaction has occurred. The licensee shall retain written proof of compliance with this subdivision. If a licensee fails, or is unable, to provide such proof to the department upon request, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that a violation of this subdivision has occurred and the department may pursue any remedies or actions available to it under the act.

(2) For purposes of this section, (a) completion of a delayed deposit transaction means the licensee has presented a maker's check for payment to a financial institution as defined in section 8-101.03 or the maker redeemed the check by paying the full amount of the check in cash to the licensee and (b) licensee shall include (i) a person related to the licensee by common ownership or control, (ii) a person in whom such licensee has any financial interest of ten percent or more, or (iii) any employee or agent of the licensee.

Laws 1994, LB 967, § 19;

Laws 2000, LB 932, § 34;

Laws 2006, LB 876, § 44;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 155.